Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-3438
Suicide mortality review team; Department of Veterans' Affairs; terms, defined.

(1) The suicide mortality review team is established in the Department of Veterans' Affairs.

(2) For purposes of sections 71-3438 to 71-3443:

(a) Department means the Department of Veterans' Affairs;

(b) Director means the Director of the Department of Veterans' Affairs or the director's designee; and

(c) Review team means the suicide mortality review team established in subsection (1) of this section.

Laws 2025, LB414, § 1.